Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 3. Handling of Property and Investments

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relative to investment of trust fund, see art. 3, § 38, Wyo. Const.

For provisions of Uniform Commercial Code concerning investment securities, see § 34.1-8-101 et seq.

Law reviews. —

See “Legal Investment for a Wyoming Trustee,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 130 (1958).

See note, “Common Trust and Mutual Fund as Legal Investments for a Wyoming Trustee,” 17 Wyo. L.J. 187 (1963).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part IV,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Trusts §§ 141 to 626.

Retrospective application of statutes relating to trust investments, 35 ALR2d 991.

Construction and effect of instrument authorizing or directing trustee to retain investments received under such instrument, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Instrument authorizing or directing trustee to retain investments received under such instrument, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Interest and divided loyalty under instrument authorizing or directing trustee to retain investments received under such instrument, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Liability of trustee as affected by instrument authorizing or directing trustee to retain investments received under such instrument, 47 A.L.R.2d 187.

Measure of trustee's liability for breach of trust in selling investment property, or changing investments, in good faith, 58 ALR2d 674.

When will may be deemed to authorize investment of trust fund in nonlegal investments, 78 ALR2d 7.

Trustee's power to exchange trust property for share of corporation organized to hold the property, 20 ALR3d 841.

Duty and liability of trustee as to diversification of investments, 24 ALR3d 730.

Construction and application of “first refusal” option contained in trust instrument and relating to sale of shares of stock, 57 ALR3d 1044.

Liability of trustee for payments or conveyances under a trust subsequently held to be invalid, 77 ALR4th 1177.

33 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 223 to 226; 39 C.J.S. Guardian and Ward §§ 70 to 135; 90A C.J.S. Trusts §§ 491 to 494, 496 to 498, 501.

§ 2-3-301.
Standard for fiduciaries; authority to acquire and retain property and investments.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling and managing property for the benefit of another, a fiduciary shall exercise the judgment and care of a prudent investor as specified under W.S.

4-10-901

through

4-10-913

.

Within the limitations of the foregoing standard, a fiduciary may:

Acquire and retain every kind of property, real, personal or mixed, and every kind of investment, specifically including bonds, debentures and other corporate obligations, and stocks, preferred or common, which persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence acquire or retain for their own account;

Retain property properly acquired, without limitation as to time and without regard to its suitability for original purchase.

Any bank as defined by W.S.

13-1-101

or any trust company formed under W.S.

13-5-102

, that is acting as a fiduciary or agent may, in its discretion or at the direction of another person who is authorized to direct the investment of money held by the bank or trust company, invest in the securities of an open end or closed end management investment company or investment trust that is registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended. The bank or trust company, or any affiliate thereof, may provide services to the investment trust or investment company, including acting as an investment advisor, manager, sponsor, distributor, custodian, transfer agent or registrar, and may receive reasonable compensation for the services. Provided, however, that with respect to any funds invested, the bank or trust company or its affiliate shall disclose to the persons to whom statements of the account are rendered consistent with the requirements of W.S. 4-10-802(f).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 36, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

4-3-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1995, ch. 85, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 1999, ch. 105, § 2; 2003, ch. 124, § 2; 2005, ch. 126, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to investing in bonds and other securities issued by University of Wyoming, see §

21-17-448

.

As to investment in community college bonds, see §

21-18-313

.

The 2005 amendment

in (c), substituted “consistent with the requirements of W.S. 4-10-802(f)” for “the rate, formula or other method by which the compensation paid is determined.”

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Investment Company Act of 1940. —

The Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to in subsection (b), is codified as 15 U.S.C. §§ 80a-1 through 80a-64.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Uniform Trustee's Powers Act: A Help to the Knowledgeable Draftsman, A Trap for the Unwary,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 533 (1979).

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

§ 2-3-302.
Departures from express terms of wills not authorized; “legal investment” or “authorized investment” construed.

Nothing contained in W.S.

2-3-301

through

2-3-305

shall be construed as authorizing any departure from, or variation of, the express terms or limitations set forth in any will, agreement, court order or other instrument creating or defining the fiduciary’s duties and powers, but the terms “legal investment” or “authorized investment” or words of similar import, as used in any instrument, shall be taken to mean any investment which is permitted by the terms of W.S.

2-3-301

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 36, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 4-3-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-303.
Authority of court to allow deviation from terms.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed as restricting the power of a court of proper jurisdiction to permit a fiduciary to deviate from the terms of any will, agreement or other instrument relating to the acquisition, investment, reinvestment, exchange, retention, sale or management of fiduciary property.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 36, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 4-3-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” appears to mean §§

2-3-301

to

2-3-305

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of sale of trust assets without consent despite trust provision requiring consent, 39 ALR4th 158.

§ 2-3-304.
Applicability; generally.

The provisions of this act shall govern fiduciaries acting under wills, agreements, court orders and other instruments now existing or hereafter made.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 36, § 4; W.S. 1977, § 4-3-104; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” appears to mean §§

2-3-301

to

2-3-305

.

§ 2-3-305.
Applicability; state funds excepted.

Nothing contained in this act shall apply to any funds belonging to the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 36, § 5; W.S. 1977, § 4-3-105; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For authority to invest in specified federal notes and bonds, see §

9-4-831

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” appears to mean §§

2-3-301

to

2-3-305

.